Washington statutes.
RCW 36.70.692

County development regulations—Proposed water uses.

For the purposes of complying with the requirements of this chapter, county development regulations must ensure that proposed water uses are consistent with RCW 90.44.050 and with applicable rules adopted pursuant to chapters 90.22 and 90.54 RCW when making decisions under RCW 19.27.097 and 58.17.110.

[ 2018 c 1 s 103.]

NOTES:

Intent—2018 c 1: See note following RCW 90.94.010.

Effective date—2018 c 1: See RCW 90.94.900.